Washington statutes.
RCW 40.06.060

Agencies to furnish lists to center.

Upon request by the center, issuing state agencies shall furnish the center with a complete list of its current state publications and a copy of its mailing and/or exchange lists.

[ 1963 c 233 s 6.]